Utah statutes.
53-3-407 (Superseded 01/01/10).   Qualifications for commercial driver
license -- Fee -- Third parties may administer skills test.
(1) (a)  As used in this section, "CDL driver training school" means a
business enterprise conducted by an individual, association, partnership, or
corporation that:
(i)  educates and trains persons, either practically or theoretically, or
both, to drive commercial motor vehicles; and
(ii)  prepares an applicant for an examination under Subsection (2)(a)(ii) or
(2)(b)(i)(B).
(b)  A CDL driver training school may charge a consideration or tuition for
the services provided under Subsection (1)(a).
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a CDL may be issued only to
a person who:
(i)  is a resident of this state or qualifies as a nonresident under Section
53-3-409;
(ii)  has passed a test of knowledge and skills for driving a commercial motor
vehicle, that complies with minimum standards established by federal
regulation in 49 C.F.R., Part 383, Subparts G and H; and
(iii)  has complied with all requirements of 49 C.F.R., Part 383 and other
applicable state laws and federal regulations.
(b) (i)  A temporary CDL may be issued to a person who:
(A)  is enrolled in a CDL driver training school located in Utah;
(B)  has passed a test of knowledge and skills for driving a commercial motor
vehicle, that complies with minimum standards established by federal
regulation in 49 C.F.R. Part 383, Subparts G and H; and
(C)  has complied with all requirements of 49 C.F.R. Part 383, Subparts G and
H.
(ii)  A temporary CDL issued under this Subsection (2)(b):
(A)  is valid for 60 days; and
(B)  may not be renewed or extended.
(iii)  Except as provided in this section and Subsections 53-3-204(1)(a)(iv),
53-3-205(8)(a)(i)(F) and (8)(b), and 53-3-410(1)(c), the provisions,
requirements, classes, endorsements, fees, restrictions, and sanctions under
this code apply to a temporary CDL issued under this Subsection (2)(b) in the
same way as a commercial driver license issued under this part.
(3)  Tests required under this section shall be prescribed and administered by
the division.
(4)  The division shall authorize a person, an agency of this or another
state, an employer, a private driver training facility or other private
institution, or a department, agency, or entity of local government to
administer the skills test required under this section if:
(a)  the test is the same test as prescribed by the division, and is
administered in the same manner; and
(b)  the party authorized under this section to administer the test has
entered into an agreement with the state that complies with the requirements
of 49 C.F.R., Part 383.75.
(5)  A person who has an appointment with the division for testing and fails
to keep the appointment or to cancel at least 48 hours in advance of the
appointment shall pay the fee under Section 53-3-105.
(6)  A person authorized under this section to administer the skills test is
not criminally or civilly liable for the administration of the test unless he
administers the test in a grossly negligent manner.
(7)  The division shall waive the skills test required under this section if
it determines that the applicant meets the requirements of 49 C.F.R., Part
383.77.
